Hawaii statutes.
[§466-41] Oversight of sponsoring
organizations. (a) The board shall retain oversight of sponsoring
organizations through the peer review oversight committee described in section
466-42.

(b) The board shall periodically publish a
list of sponsoring organizations that have been approved by the board. [L 2012,
c 324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next